District of Columbia statutes.
31-1355

Attachment, garnishment, and levy of execution.

During the pendency in this, or any other state, of a liquidation proceeding, whether called by that name or not, no action or proceeding in the nature of an attachment, garnishment, or levy of execution shall be commenced or maintained in the District against the delinquent insurer or its assets.

Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-35, § 56, 40 DCR 5773
1981 Ed., § 35-2855.